Hawaii, session 2026, HB1677.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $5,400,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the thirty-first representative district, as follows: 1.   Moanalua elementary school Construction for a multipurpose innovation center phase 2. Construction                 $2,900,000 Total funding                     $2,900,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 2.   Salt Lake elementary school Plans, land, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for a covered basketball court with security fencing. Plans                           $50,000 Land                             $1,000 Design                           $9,000 Construction                   $150,000 Equipment                       $40,000 Total funding                       $250,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 3.   Admiral Arthur W. Radford high school Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for the installation of a jumbotron score board for the athletic stadium. Plans                           $20,000 Design                          $20,000 Construction                   $120,000 Equipment                      $340,000 Total funding                       $500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 4.   Moanalua high school Design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for the replacement of central air conditioning equipment and related infrastructure. Design                         $250,000 Construction                 $1,000,000 Equipment                      $500,000 Total funding                     $1,750,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________